ru: Стандарт крепления ротора: 4 болта; 6 болтов; Center Lock; Шлицевое; Другое
hu: Rotor rögzítési felülete: 4 csavaros; 6 csavaros; Center Lock; Bordás; Egyéb
th: มาตรฐานการติดตั้งใบพัด: 4 รูนอต; 6 รูนอต; Center Lock; Spline; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 轉子安裝標準: 4 螺栓; 6 螺栓; 中心鎖死; 栓槽; 其他
da: Monteringsstandard for rotor: 4 bolte; 6 bolte; Center Lock; Spline; Andet
sv: Standard för rotormontering: 4-bult; 6-bult; Centerlock; Splines; Övrigt
ro-RO: Standard de montare a rotorului: 4 șuruburi; 6 șuruburi; Center Lock; Canelat; Altele
it: Standard di montaggio del rotore: A 4 fori; A 6 fori; Center Lock; Scanalato; Altro
sl-SI: Vmesnik za montažo rotorja: 4 vijaki; 6 vijakov; Center Lock; Zobata os; Drugo
nl: Montagestandaard rotor: 4-bouts; 6-bouts; Center Lock; Spline; Overige
ja: ローターマウント標準: 4 ボルト; 6 ボルト; センターロック; スプライン; その他
tr: Rotor montaj standardı: 4 cıvatalı; 6 cıvatalı; Merkezi kilit; Kama; Diğer
pt-BR: Disco de freio, padrão de fixação: 4 furos; 6 furos; Center Lock; Estriado; Outro
cs: Standard montáže rotoru: 4 šrouby; 6 šroubů; Center Lock; Drážkovaný; Jiné
vi: Tiêu chuẩn gắn roto: 4 bu lông; 6 bu lông; Khóa giữa; Rãnh then; Khác
el: Πρότυπο στερέωσης ρότορα: 4 βιδών; 6 βιδών; Center Lock; Σφηνωτός; Άλλο
fr: Norme de fixation du rotor: 4 vis; 6 vis; Center Lock; Cannelé; Autre
fi: Roottorin asennusstandardi: 4-pulttinen; 6-pulttinen; Center Lock; Uritettu; Muu
ko: 로터 장착 규격: 4볼트; 6볼트; 센터 락; 스플라인; 기타
sk-SK: Norma montáže rotora: 4-skrutkový; 6-skrutkový; Center Lock; Drážkovaný; Iné
lt-LT: Rotoriaus montavimo standartas: 4 varžtų; 6 varžtų; „Center Lock“; Išdrožinis; Kita
pl: Standard montażu wirnika: Na 4 śruby; Na 6 śrub; Center Lock; Wielowypustowy; Inny
de: Standardmontage der Scheibenbremse: 4-Loch; 6-Loch; Center Lock; Spline; Sonstige
zh-CN: 刹车片安装标准: 4 螺栓; 6 螺栓; 中心锁死; 花键; 其他
hr-HR: Standard montaže rotora: 4 vijka; 6 vijaka; Center Lock; Žlijeb; Ostalo
es: Estándar de montaje del rotor: 4 tornillos; 6 tornillos; Center Lock; Ranurado; Otro
nb: Monteringsstandard for rotor: 4-bolt; 6-bolt; Senterlås; Spline; Annet
bg-BG: Стандарт за монтаж на ротора: С 4 болта; С 6 болта; Center Lock; Шлиц; Друго
pt-PT: Norma de montagem do rotor: 4 parafusos; 6 parafusos; Center Lock; Estriado; Outro
en: Rotor mounting standard: 4-bolt; 6-bolt; Center Lock; Spline; Other